Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 5 METROPOLITAN SEWAGE DISPOSAL DISTRICTS
32-4-514. Annexation and consolidation of territory by municipalities.

All territory which may be annexed to a municipality after its inclusion within the boundaries of the district and the entire consolidated territory resulting from a consolidation of a municipality included within the district with a municipality not so included shall, without further action by the municipality or the board of directors of the district, become a part of and included within the boundaries of the district; but if it is infeasible for any part of the annexed or consolidated territory to be served by the district's facilities, the municipality may, prior to or within ninety days after such annexation or consolidation is completed, petition the board of directors of the district for an exclusion of the territory which cannot feasibly be served.

Upon receipt of such a petition, the board of directors shall consider the same, and, if it determines that the territory petitioned to be excluded cannot feasibly be served by the facilities of the district, the board by resolution may exclude the same from the boundaries of the district, and such exclusion shall be retroactive to the date of annexation or consolidation. A certified copy of the resolution excluding the territory shall be forthwith transmitted to the division of local government in the department of local affairs, and three certified copies shall be forthwith transmitted to the clerk of the municipality, and the clerk of the municipality shall cause a certified copy of the resolution to be recorded in the county or counties in which the municipality is located and a copy thereof delivered to the office of the county assessor and county treasurer of each county in which the excluded territory is located. Additional certified copies of such resolution shall be issued by the secretary of the district upon request.

Source:

L. 60:

p. 175, § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 89-15-10.

L. 62:

p. 195, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-10.

L. 76:

(2) amended, p. 602, § 20, effective July 1.

32-4-515. Exclusion of territory.

Should the governing body of any municipality which is included within the district determine by ordinance, adopted after a public hearing called and held as provided in section 32-4-508 (1)(d), that said municipality or any portion thereof cannot feasibly be served by the district's facilities, such municipality may file with the district a certified copy of such ordinance and request that said municipality or a designated portion thereof be excluded from the district.

Upon receipt of such ordinance the board of directors of the district shall cause an investigation to be made to determine whether or not the municipality or the designated portion thereof can feasibly be served by the district's facilities.

Upon completion of said investigation, and in any event not later than ninety days from the filing of the ordinance with the district, the board of directors of the district shall by resolution determine that the area sought to be excluded can or cannot be feasibly served by the district's facilities. If the board of directors of the district determines that the area can feasibly be served by the district's facilities, the exclusion sought shall be denied.

If the board of directors of the district determines that the area sought to be excluded cannot feasibly be served by the district's facilities, the board of directors of the district shall adopt a resolution excluding the area from the district, and a certified copy of such resolution shall forthwith be filed with the director of the division of local government in the department of local affairs, who shall forthwith issue a certificate of exclusion describing the territory so excluded and shall transmit to the clerk of the municipality three certified copies of such certificate of exclusion, and the clerk of the municipality shall forthwith record a copy of such certificate in the office of the county clerk and recorder of each county in which the municipality may be located and shall deliver a copy to the county assessor and the county treasurer of each county in which the municipality is located; but, so long as any securities of the district are outstanding, no exclusion of territory shall be made which will reduce the revenue of the district, nor shall any exclusion of territory reduce the district's minimum charges and charges for availability of service.

Source:

L. 60:

p. 176, § 11.

CRS 53:

§ 89-15-11.

L. 62:

p. 196, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-11.

L. 76:

(3)(b) amended, p. 603, § 21, effective July 1.

32-4-516. Service of areas outside the boundaries of the district.

Any municipality included within the district may discharge into the district's facilities sewage and industrial wastes received by its system from areas not within the corporate limits of the municipality, but in that case the sewage and industrial wastes so received from outside the district boundaries and discharged into the district's facilities shall be considered, for the purposes of this part 5, as being sewage and industrial waste of that municipality.

Source:

L. 60:

p. 177, § 12.

CRS 53:

§ 89-15-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-12.

32-4-517. Dissolution of districts.

Any metropolitan sewage disposal district formed under this part 5 which has no indebtedness, securities, or other obligations outstanding or which has made full provision for their payment, may be dissolved by vote of a majority of the electors voting at an election to be held for the purpose of voting upon the dissolution of the district and which election shall be held in the manner provided for the holding of elections as set forth in section 32-4-518.

An election submitting the proposition of dissolution of the district may be initiated by a resolution of the board of directors adopted by three-fourths of all of the members of the board of directors of such district calling an election for that purpose, or by the filing with the clerk of the district resolutions requesting such an election, passed and adopted by the governing bodies of three-fourths of all of the municipalities included within the boundaries of the district.

In the event the vote is for dissolution, the board of directors of the district shall proceed to terminate the affairs of the district and any funds remaining in the district treasury, after all obligations of the district have been discharged and the costs of terminating the district's affairs have been paid, shall be divided among the municipalities included within the district in proportion to the population of each such municipality, as determined by the latest estimate made by the director of the division of planning.

Source:

L. 60:

p. 177, § 13.

CRS 53:

§ 89-15-13.

L. 62:

p. 196, § 9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-13.

L. 70:

p. 286, § 86.

L. 71:

p. 962, § 6.

32-4-518. Elections.

Wherever in this part 5 an election is permitted or required, the election may be held separately or may be coordinated with any primary or general election held under the laws of the state of Colorado. The elections shall be held and conducted as provided in articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S. The board of directors shall call the election by resolution adopted pursuant to section

1-5-203

, C.R.S.

The board, in the case of any election not to be coordinated with a primary or general election, shall appoint a designated election official responsible for assuring that the election is held according to the provisions of articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 895, § 138, effective January 1, 1993.)

If the election is coordinated with a primary or general election, it shall be held according to the provisions of section

1-7-116

, C.R.S.

to (4) (Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 895, § 138, effective January 1, 1993.)

Source:

L. 60:

p. 178, § 14.

CRS 53:

§ 89-15-14.

L. 62:

p. 196, § 10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-14.

L. 70:

p. 287, § 87.

L. 77:

(3) amended, p. 1505, § 57, effective July 15.

L. 81:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1624, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 82:

(1)(c) amended, p. 495, § 1, effective February 19.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 895, § 138, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(1)(a), (1)(b), and (1)(d) amended, p. 1440, § 139, effective July 1.

32-4-519. Authorization.

In addition to powers elsewhere conferred by law on municipalities, municipalities participating in the organization of a district and municipalities included within a district under this part 5 have every power necessary, requisite, or proper to effectuate the purposes of this part 5, including, without limitation, the power to acquire and operate a sewer system as defined in section 32-4-502 (32), and to impose, collect, and enforce rates for services rendered or made available by or through such system.

Source:

L. 60:

p. 178, § 15.

CRS 53:

§ 89-15-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-15.

32-4-520. Correction of faulty notices.

In any case where a notice is provided for in this part 5, if the board, governing body, or court having jurisdiction of the matter finds for any reason that due notice was not given, the board, governing body, or court shall not thereby lose jurisdiction, and the proceeding in question shall not thereby be void or be abated, but the board, governing body, or court shall order due notice to be given, and shall continue the hearing until such time as notice shall be properly given, and thereupon shall proceed as though notice had been properly given in the first instance.

Source:

L. 60:

p. 178, § 16.

CRS 53:

§ 89-15-16.

L. 62:

p. 199, § 11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-16.

32-4-521. Early hearings.

All cases in which there may arise a question of validity of the organization of a district, or a question of the validity of any proceeding under this part 5, shall be advanced as a matter of immediate public interest and concern, and heard at the earliest practicable moment. The courts shall be open at all times for the purpose of this part 5.

Source:

L. 60:

p. 179, § 17.

CRS 53:

§ 89-15-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-17.

32-4-522. Rates and service charges.

Every district and municipality fixing and collecting rates or charges, or both, as provided in section 32-4-510 (1)(l) and elsewhere in this part 5, or otherwise, is, in supplementation of such powers, authorized to fix and collect rents, rates, fees, tolls, and other charges, in this part 5 sometimes referred to as "service charges", for direct or indirect connection with, or the use or services of, a sewage disposal system or sewer system, respectively, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, minimum charges and charges for the availability of service.

Such service charges may be charged to and collected in advance or otherwise by a district from any municipality within the district and by any municipality from any person contracting for such connection or use or services or from the owner or occupant, or both of them, of any real property which directly or indirectly is or has been or will be connected with the sewer system or from which or on which originates or has originated sewage or other wastes which directly or indirectly have entered or may enter the sewage disposal system and sewer system, and the municipality or owner, or occupant, of any such real property shall be liable for and shall pay such service charges to the district or municipality fixing the service charges at the time when and place where such service charges are due and payable.

Such service charges of any district may accrue from any date on which its board reasonably estimates, in any resolution authorizing the issuance of any securities or other instrument appertaining thereto or in any contract with any municipality, that any sewage disposal system or project being acquired or improved and equipped will be available for service or use.

Such rents, rates, fees, tolls, and other charges, being in the nature of use or service charges, shall, as nearly as the district or municipality fixing the service charges shall deem practicable and equitable, be reasonable, and shall be uniform throughout the district or municipality for the same type, class, and amount of use or service of the sewage disposal system or sewer system, and may be based or computed either: On measurements of sewage flow devices duly provided and maintained by the district or by the municipality or any user as approved by the district or municipality fixing such charges, and analyses of sewage samples procured and made by or in a manner approved by the district; or on the consumption of water in or on or in connection with the municipality or real property, making due allowance for commercial use of water and infiltration of groundwater and discharge of surface run-off to the sewer system; or on the number and kind of water outlets on or in connection with the municipality or real property, or on the number and kind of plumbing or sewage fixtures or facilities in or on or in connection with the municipality or real property; or on the number of persons residing or working in or on or otherwise connected or identified with the municipality or real property, or on the capacity of the improvements in or on or connected with the municipality or real property; or upon the availability of service or readiness to serve by the system; or on any other factors determining the type, class, and amount of use or service of the sewage disposal system or sewer system; or on any combination of any such factors, and may give weight to the characteristics of the sewage and other wastes and any other special matter affecting the cost of treatment and disposal thereof, including chlorine demand, biochemical oxygen demand, concentration of solids, and chemical composition.

Reasonable penalties may be fixed for any delinquencies, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, interest on delinquent service charges from any date due at a rate of not exceeding one percent per month, or fraction thereof, reasonable attorneys' fees, and other costs of collection.

The district or municipality fixing the service charges shall prescribe and, from time to time, when necessary revise a schedule of such service charges, which shall comply with the terms of any contract of the district or municipality fixing the service charges, and in any event shall be such that the revenues from the service charges of the district or municipality will at all times be adequate, except to the extent that the proceeds of any general ad valorem tax or other moneys are available and used, after an allowance is made for delinquencies accrued and reasonably estimated to accrue by the board or governing body fixing the service charges, for the payment of such service charges, whether resulting from any delinquency of any municipality, other public body, or other person, or from any other cause:

To pay all expenses of operation and maintenance of the sewage disposal system or sewer system, including reserves, insurance, and improvements;

To pay punctually the principal of and interest on any securities payable from revenues of the sewage disposal system or sewer system and issued or to be issued by the district or municipality fixing the service charges;

To maintain such reserves or sinking funds therefor; and

For the payment of any expenses incidental to any sewage disposal system or sewer system or any project authorized in this part 5, any contingencies, acquisitions, improvements, and equipment, and any other cost, as may be required by the terms of any contract of, or as may be deemed necessary or desirable by, the district or municipality fixing the service charges.

Said schedule shall thus be prescribed and from time to time revised by the district or municipality. A public hearing thereon may be, but is not required to be, held by the district or municipality at least seven days after such published notice is given, as the district or municipality may determine to be reasonable. The district or municipality shall fix and determine the times when and the places where such service charges shall be due and payable and may require that such service charges shall be paid in advance for a period of not more than one year. A copy of such schedule of service charges in effect shall at all times be kept on file at the principal office of the district or municipality fixing the service charges and shall at all reasonable times be open to public inspection.

The legislature has determined and declared that the obligations arising from time to time of any municipality or person to pay service charges fixed in connection with any sewage disposal system or sewer system shall constitute general obligations of the municipality or person charged with their payment; but as such obligations accrue for current services and benefits from and use of any such system, the obligations shall not constitute an indebtedness of the municipality or other public body within the meaning of any constitutional, charter, or statutory limitation or other provision restricting the incurrence of any debt.

No board, agency, bureau, commission, or official, other than the board of the district or the governing body of the municipality fixing the service charges, has authority to fix, prescribe, levy, modify, supervise, or regulate the making of service charges, nor to prescribe, supervise, or regulate the performance of services appertaining to a sewage disposal system or sewer system, as authorized in this part 5; but this subsection (6) shall not be construed to be a limitation on the contracting powers of the board of any district or the governing body of any municipality within the district.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 202, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-21.

32-4-523. Form of borrowing.

Upon the conditions and under the circumstances set forth in this part 5, a district, to carry out the purposes of this part 5, from time to time may borrow money to defray the cost of any project, or any part thereof, as the board may determine, and issue the following securities to evidence such borrowing: Debentures, warrants, bonds, interim receipts, temporary certificates, temporary bonds, and notes.

A district is authorized to borrow money without an election in anticipation of taxes or other revenues, or both, and to issue debentures to evidence the amount so borrowed.

A district is authorized to defray the cost of any services, supplies, equipment, or other materials furnished to or for the benefit of the district by the issuance of warrants to evidence the amount due therefor, without an election, in anticipation of taxes or other revenues, or both.

Debentures and warrants may mature at such time or times not exceeding five years from the date of their issuance as the board may determine. They shall not be extended or funded except by the issuance of bonds or notes in compliance with subsection (5) or (7) of this section.

A district is authorized to borrow money in anticipation of taxes or other revenues, or both, and to issue bonds to evidence the amount so borrowed. With the exception of a district that qualifies as an enterprise in accordance with section 20 (2)(d) of article X of the state constitution, no bonded indebtedness shall be created by a district, without first submitting a proposition of issuing such bonds, and the maximum net effective interest rate at which such bonds may be issued, to the electors of the district and being approved, at an election held for that purpose, in accordance with section 32-4-518. Bonds so authorized may be issued in one series or more and may mature at such time or times not exceeding forty years from their issuance as the board may determine.

A district is authorized to issue interim receipts or temporary certificates or temporary bonds, pending preparation of definitive bonds and exchangeable for the definitive bonds when prepared, as the board may determine. Each holder of any such temporary security shall have all the rights and remedies which he would have as a holder of the definitive bonds.

A district is authorized to borrow money and to issue notes evidencing "construction" or short-term loans for the acquisition or improvement and equipment of a sewage disposal system or any project in supplementation of long-term financing and the issuance of bonds, as provided in section 32-4-535 and elsewhere in this part 5.

Nothing in this part 5 shall be construed as creating or authorizing the creation of an indebtedness on the part of any municipality included in the district.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 205, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-22.

L. 70:

p. 287, § 88.

L. 81:

(4) amended, p. 1639, § 4, effective May 8.

L. 2002:

(5) amended, p. 46, § 1, effective August 7.

32-4-524. Payment of securities.

All securities issued by the district shall be authorized by resolution.

The district may pledge its full faith and credit for the payment of any securities authorized in this part 5, the interest thereon, any prior redemption premiums, and any charges appertaining thereto. Such securities may constitute the direct and general or special obligations of the district. Their payment may be secured by a specific pledge of tax proceeds and other revenues of the district, in this part 5 sometimes referred to as "revenues" of the district, as the board may determine.

The board, in connection with such additionally secured securities, in the resolution authorizing their issuance or other instrument appertaining thereto may pledge all or a portion of such revenues, subject to any prior pledges, as additional security for such payment of said securities, and at its option may deposit such revenues in a fund created to pay the securities or created to secure additionally their payment.

Any such revenues pledged directly or as additional security for the payment of securities of any one issue or series which revenues are not exclusively pledged therefor, may subsequently be pledged directly or as additional security for the payment of the securities of one or more issues or series subsequently authorized.

All securities of the same issue or series shall, subject to the prior and superior rights of outstanding securities, claims, and other obligations, have a prior, paramount, and superior lien on the revenues pledged for the payment of the securities over and ahead of any lien there against subsequently incurred of any other securities; but, the resolution authorizing, or other instrument appertaining to, the issuance of any securities may provide for the subsequent authorization of bonds or other securities, the lien for the payment of which on such revenues is on a parity with the lien thereon of the subject securities upon such conditions and subject to such limitations as said resolution or other instrument may provide.

All securities of the same issue or series shall be equally and ratably secured without priority by reason of number, date of maturity, date of securities, of sale, of execution, or of delivery, by a lien on said revenues in accordance with the provisions of this part 5 and the resolution authorizing, or other instrument appertaining to, said securities, except to the extent such resolution or other instrument shall otherwise specifically provide.

Each such security issued under this part 5 shall recite in substance that said security and the interest thereon are payable solely from the revenues or other moneys pledged to the payment thereof. Securities specifically pledging the full faith and credit of the district for their payment shall so state.

The payment of securities shall not be secured by an encumbrance, mortgage, or other pledge of property of the district, except for revenues, income, tax proceeds, and other moneys pledged for the payment of securities. No property of the district, subject to said exception, shall be liable to be forfeited or taken in payment of the securities.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 206, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-23.

32-4-525. Incontestable recital in securities.

Any resolution authorizing, or other instrument appertaining to, any securities under this part 5 may provide that each security therein authorized shall recite that it is issued under authority of this part 5. Such recital shall conclusively impart full compliance with all of the provisions of this part 5, and all securities issued containing such recital shall be incontestable for any cause whatsoever after their delivery for value.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 207, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-24.

32-4-526. Security details.

Any securities in this part 5 authorized to be issued shall bear such date, shall be in such denomination, shall mature at such time but in no event exceeding forty years from their date, shall bear interest at a rate such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of securities does not exceed the maximum net effective interest rate authorized, which interest may be evidenced by one or two sets of coupons, payable annually or semiannually; except that the first coupon appertaining to any security may represent interest for any period, not in excess of one year, as may be prescribed by resolution or other instrument; and said securities and any coupons shall be payable in such medium of payment at any banking institution or such other place within or without the state, including but not limited to the office of the treasurer of any county in which the district is located wholly or in part, as determined by the board, and said securities at the option of the board may be in one or more series, may be made subject to prior redemption in advance of maturity in such order or by lot or otherwise at such time without or with the payment of such premium, not exceeding six percent of the principal amount of each security so redeemed, as determined by the board.

Any resolution authorizing the issuance of securities or other instrument appertaining thereto may capitalize interest on any securities during any period of construction estimated by the board and one year thereafter and any other cost of any project, by providing for the payment of the amount capitalized from the proceeds of the securities.

Securities may be issued with privileges for conversion or registration, or both, for payment as to principal or interest, or both; and where interest accruing on the securities is not represented by interest coupons, the securities may provide for the endorsing of payments of interest thereof; and the securities generally shall be issued in such manner, in such form, either coupon or registered, with such recitals, terms, covenants and conditions, and with such other details, as may be provided by the board in the resolution authorizing the securities, or other instrument appertaining thereto, except as otherwise provided in this part 5.

Any resolution authorizing the issuance of securities or any other instrument appertaining thereto may provide for their reissuance in other denominations in negotiable or nonnegotiable form and otherwise in such manner and form as the board may determine.

Subject to the payment provisions specifically provided in this part 5, said debentures, warrants, bonds, any interest coupons thereto attached, and such interim receipts or temporary certificates or temporary bonds, and notes shall be fully negotiable within the meaning of and for all the purposes of article 8 of title 4, C.R.S., except as the board may otherwise provide; and each holder of such security, or of any coupon appertaining thereto, by accepting such security or coupon shall be conclusively deemed to have agreed that such security or coupon, except as otherwise provided, is and shall be fully negotiable within the meaning and for all purposes of said article.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board in any proceedings authorizing securities under this part 5:

May provide for the initial issuance of one or more securities, in this subsection (6) called "bond", aggregating the amount of the entire issue;

May make such provision for installment payments of the principal amount of any such bond as it may consider desirable;

May provide for the making of any such bond payable to bearer or otherwise, registrable as to principal or as to both principal and interest, and where interest accruing thereon is not represented by interest coupons, for the endorsing of payments of interest on such bonds;

May further make provision in any such proceedings for the manner and circumstances in which any such bond may in the future, at the request of the holder thereof, be converted into bonds of smaller denominations, which bonds of smaller denominations may in turn be either coupon bonds or bonds registrable as to principal, or principal and interest, or both.

If lost or completely destroyed, any security may be reissued in the form and tenor of the lost or destroyed security upon the owner furnishing, to the satisfaction of the board: Proof of ownership; proof of loss or destruction; a surety bond in twice the face amount of the security and any coupons; and payment of the cost of preparing and issuing the new security.

Any security shall be executed in the name of and on behalf of the district and signed by the chairman of the board, with the seal of the district affixed thereto and attested by the secretary of the district.

Except for any bonds which are registrable for payment of interest, interest coupons payable to bearer and appertaining to the bonds shall be issued and shall bear the original or facsimile signature of the chairman of the board.

Any one of said officers, after filing with the secretary of state his manual signature certified by him under oath, may execute or cause to be executed with a facsimile signature in lieu of his manual signature any security authorized in this part 5, but such a filing is not a condition of execution with a facsimile signature of any interest coupon, and provided that at least one signature required or permitted to be placed on each such security, excluding any interest coupon, shall be manually subscribed. An officer's facsimile signature has the same legal effect as his manual signature.

The secretary of the district may cause the seal of the district to be printed, engraved, stamped, or otherwise placed in facsimile on any security. The facsimile seal has the same legal effect as the impression of the seal.

The securities and any coupons bearing the signatures of the officers in office at the time of the signing thereof shall be binding obligations of the district, notwithstanding that before the delivery thereof and payment therefor, any or all of the persons whose signatures appear thereon shall have ceased to fill their respective offices.

Any officer in this part 5 authorized or permitted to sign any security or interest coupon, at the time of its execution and of the execution of a signature certificate, may adopt as his own facsimile signature the facsimile signature of his predecessor in office in the event that such facsimile signature appears upon the security or coupons appertaining thereto, or upon both the security and such coupons.

The securities may be repurchased by the district out of any funds available for such purpose from the project to which they pertain at a price of not more than the principal amount thereof and accrued interest, plus the amount of the premium, if any, which might on the next redemption date of such securities be paid to the holders thereof if such securities should be called for redemption on such date pursuant to their terms, and all securities so repurchased shall be canceled.

The resolution authorizing the securities or other instrument appertaining thereto may contain any agreement or provision customarily contained in instruments securing securities, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, covenants designated in section 32-4-529.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 207, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-25.

L. 70:

p. 287, § 89.

L. 75:

(5) amended, p. 220, § 68, effective July 16.

32-4-527. Sale of securities.

Any securities authorized in this part 5, except for warrants not issued for cash, and except for interim receipts or certificates or temporary bonds issued pending preparation of definitive bonds, shall be sold at public or private sale for not less than the principal amount thereof and accrued interest, or at the board's option, below par at a discount not exceeding six percent of the principal amount thereof and at a price such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of securities does not exceed the maximum net effective interest rate authorized. For any securities the issuance of which does not require approval at an election pursuant to this part 5, the maximum net effective interest rate shall be established by the board prior to the time such securities are sold and issued.

No discount, except as provided in this part 5, or commission shall be allowed or paid on or for any security sale to any purchaser or bidder, directly or indirectly; but nothing contained in this part 5 shall be construed as prohibiting the board from employing legal, fiscal, engineering, and other expert services in connection with any project or facilities authorized in this part 5, and with the authorization, issuance, and sale of securities.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 210, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-26.

L. 70:

p. 288, § 90.

32-4-528. Application of proceeds.

All moneys received from the issuance of any securities authorized in this part 5 shall be used solely for the purposes for which issued and the cost of any project thereby delineated.

Any accrued interest and any premium shall be applied to the payment of the interest on or the principal of the securities, or both interest and principal, or shall be deposited in a reserve therefor, as the board may determine.

Any unexpended balance of such security proceeds remaining after the completion of the acquisition or improvement and equipment of the project or the completion of the purposes for which such securities were issued shall be paid immediately into the fund created for the payment of the principal of said securities and shall be used therefor, subject to the provisions as to the times and methods for their payment as stated in the securities and the proceedings authorizing or otherwise appertaining to their issuance, or in a reserve therefor.

The validity of said securities shall not be dependent on nor affected by the validity or regularity of any proceedings relating to the acquisition or improvement and equipment of the project or the proper completion of any project for which the securities are issued.

The purchasers of the securities shall in no manner be responsible for the application of the proceeds of the securities by the district or any of its officers, agents, and employees.

Source:

L. 62:

p. 211, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-15-27.